Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 1 General Provisions

49-4-1.
Short title.

The short title of this article shall be “Georgia Public Assistance Act of 1965.”

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note discussing the denial of social security benefits to dependent children pursuant to substitute father provisions as violative of due process, prior to the 1967 amendments to the Georgia Public Assistance Act (O.C.G.A. §

49-4-1

et seq.), see 15 J. of Pub. L. 349 (1966).

49-4-2.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Department” means the Department of Human Services and includes the county departments of family and children services and the agents, agencies, officers, and employees designated by the commissioner of human services to perform any function vested in the Department of Human Services by this article.

“Public assistance” means payment in or by money, medical care, remedial care, goods, or services to or for the benefit of needy persons under any categories that may be established pursuant to this article.

“Recipient” means a person to whom, or on whose behalf, public assistance is granted.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 2; Ga. L. 1967, p. 878, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 19; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “commissioner of human services” was substituted for “commissioner of human resources” in paragraph (1).

49-4-3.
Establishment of categories of public assistance; powers and duties in administration of article.

The Department of Human Services is authorized to establish any of the following categories of public assistance and to adopt plans combining the administration of such categories of public assistance as the Department of Human Services may elect:

Old-age assistance;

Aid to the blind;

Aid to the disabled;

Temporary assistance for needy families; and

Aid to the aged, blind, and adult disabled persons under a combined plan adopted pursuant to Title XX of the federal Social Security Act.

This article shall be administered by the Department of Human Services, including the county departments of family and children services acting under the direction and supervision of the commissioner. In administering this article the department, including the county departments acting under the direction and supervision of the director of the Division of Family and Children Services, shall:

Provide for maximum cooperation with other agencies, public and private, of this state, of other states, and of the federal government in rendering services to maintain and strengthen family life and to help applicants for public assistance and recipients to attain self-support or self-care;

Establish and enforce such rules and regulations as may be necessary or desirable to carry out this article; provided, however, that the commissioner of the Department of Human Services may delegate to the director of the Division of Family and Children Services the responsibility for the development and issuance of procedural manuals;

Cooperate in all necessary respects with agencies of the United States government in the administration of this article, and accept any funds, goods, or services available to the department for public assistance and for other welfare programs and projects;

Enter into reciprocal and cooperative agreements with other agencies of this state and with agencies of any other state relative to the providing of assistance or service to residents and nonresidents; and

Make reports at such times and in such form as may be required by agencies of the United States government.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 3; Ga. L. 1967, p. 878, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 883, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 49; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

Cross references.

Duty and authority of department to enforce support duty of parents whose children are receiving public assistance from department, §

19-11-1

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

U.S. Code.

Title XX of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in paragraph (a)(5) of this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1397

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 284 (1997).

49-4-4.
Residence in state as affecting eligibility for public assistance.

Public assistance shall be awarded to, or on behalf of, any individual who is a resident of this state and is otherwise eligible therefor under one of the categories established pursuant to this article, as determined in accordance with the regulations of the board; provided, however, that residence in this state in excess of one year may not be required with respect to any individual under any category; and provided, further, that with respect to “medical assistance” no residence requirement which excludes any individual who resides in this state may be imposed.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 4; Ga. L. 1967, p. 878, § 4.

49-4-5.
Determining amount of public assistance.

The amount of public assistance which any person shall receive shall be determined in accordance with regulations approved by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 5.

49-4-6.
Reserves, income, and resources to be disregarded.

In determining eligibility for and the amount and kind of public assistance to be provided, the board shall prescribe by regulations reasonable emergency reserves and the income and resources which may be exempt and disregarded. With respect to any category of assistance, the income and resources to be disregarded shall not be in excess of the amounts and kinds authorized under the federal Social Security Act and shall not be less than the amounts and kinds of income and resources required to be disregarded by the federal Social Security Act and any other act of Congress relating to the assistance programs in which federal financial participation is authorized under Titles IV, XVI, XIX, and XX of the federal Social Security Act.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, this chapter, or state law, to the extent that such disregard does not violate federal law or terminate or decrease the state’s eligibility for federal funding for public assistance or for disabled persons, the Department of Human Services, the Department of Community Health, and their successors shall disregard for the purpose of eligibility for public assistance or assistance for disabled persons any funds or property held in trust for a disabled person by a community trust created and administered in accordance with Chapter 10 of Title 30, a trust for a person with one or more impairments with substantially similar provisions for distributions, or any noncash distributions from such trusts.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 14; Ga. L. 1967, p. 878, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 49; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1435, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 804, § 3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 49/HB 90.

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted former subsection (b), which read: “For purposes of applying the $50.00 child support disregard provided for in Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, amounts paid by the Social Security Administration under the Old Age Survivors and Disability Insurance (OASDI) program, payments made by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to the family, and any other benefits not assignable to the state pursuant to Title IV of the federal Social Security Act shall not be considered child support.”; and redesignated former subsection (c) as present subsection (b).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “community trust” was substituted for “Community Trust” in subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 1435, § 5(b), not codified by the General Assembly, provided: “Subsection (b) of Code Section 49-4-6, as amended by Section 1 of this Act, is repealed effective on the date on which the federal acts referenced herein or any federal regulations or interpretations of such act or regulations by the federal agency or a judicial decision binding on the State of Georgia are amended or changed to allow federal financial participation in AFDC payments which treat social security disability benefits or veterans’ benefits in the same manner as other child support payments.”

Those provisions of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act relating to the child support disregard (

42 U.S.C. § 602(a)

(8)(A)(vi) ) were repealed by § 103 of P.L. 104-193, the “Personal Responsibility & Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996.”

U.S. Code.

Titles IV, XVI, XIX, and XX of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, are codified at 42 U.S.C. §§ 601 et seq., 1381 et seq., 1396 et seq., 1397 et seq., respectively.

Law reviews.

For article, “Special Needs Trusts:
A Planning Tool with Promises,” see 16 (No. 2) Ga. St. B.J. 18 (2010).

49-4-7.
Receipt of compensation for residence sold by government action not to affect eligibility.

Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, an individual who is otherwise qualified to receive any public assistance administered by the department shall not become ineligible to continue to receive such benefits because of the receipt of compensation by such individual from the sale or acquisition of any real estate used as the residence of such individual as the result of displacement through the necessity of governmental action which directly or indirectly causes the sale or acquisition of such property. Such individual may receive such compensation; hold, invest, and reinvest the proceeds thereof in any manner whatsoever; and continue to receive such benefits if he shall remain otherwise qualified; provided, however, this article shall not become effective until approved by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 616, § 1.

49-4-8.
Application for public assistance.

Applications for public assistance shall be submitted to and accepted by the county department of the county of the applicant’s residence from or on behalf of any person who believes himself eligible for public assistance. Such applications shall be made in the manner and form prescribed by the Department of Human Services and shall contain such information as the department shall require.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

49-4-9.
Investigation and record concerning applicant.

Whenever a county department shall receive an application for public assistance, the county department shall promptly make an investigation and record of the circumstances of the applicant in order to ascertain the facts supporting the application and to obtain such other information as may be required by the Department of Human Services.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

49-4-10.
Physical examination of applicant.

With respect to applicants for any category of public assistance authorized under Code Section 49-4-3, the department may require physical examinations of any applicant and may require the results thereof to be recorded by the examining physician on a form furnished by the department. Upon receipt of the form from the examining physician, the county department shall forward it to the department, whose duty it shall be to review the medical information contained thereon and determine therefrom whether the applicant meets the medical requirements for assistance under this article. When said decision has been made by the department, the county department will be notified and bound thereby.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 18.

49-4-11.
Award and payment of public assistance.

Upon the completion of the investigation under Code Section 49-4-9, the county department shall decide whether the applicant is eligible for assistance under this article and determine, in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Board of Human Services, the amount and kind of such assistance and the date on which such assistance shall begin. After a determination has been made as to the eligibility for and the type and amount of assistance to be provided, such assistance shall be furnished with reasonable promptness to all eligible persons in accordance with regulations of the board.

Money payments of public assistance shall be made by check or electronic transfer in accordance with the regulations of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 8; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-3/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 284 (1997).

49-4-12.
Periodic redetermination of award; reporting changes in recipient’s circumstances; review by department.

All public assistance grants made under this article shall be reconsidered by the county departments of family and children services as frequently as may be required by rules of the Board of Human Services; but in every case the county department shall make such reconsideration at least once each year. After such further investigation as the commissioner may deem necessary, the amount of public assistance may be changed or may be entirely withdrawn if it is found by the department that any such grant has been made erroneously or if it is found that the recipient’s circumstances have altered sufficiently to warrant such action.

If, at any time during the continuance of public assistance, the recipient thereof becomes possessed of income or resources in excess of the amount previously reported by him or if other changes shall occur in the circumstances previously reported by him which would alter either his need or his eligibility, it shall be his duty to notify the county department of such fact immediately on the receipt or possession of such additional income or resources or on the change of circumstances.

The department may also, upon its own motion, review any decision of a county department and may consider any application upon which a decision has not been made by the county department within a reasonable time. Where the department, on its own motion, reviews a decision of a county department or considers applications upon which a decision has not been made, it may make such additional investigation as it may deem necessary; and it shall determine whether the applicant shall be granted assistance and the amount of such assistance and whether assistance being paid to a recipient shall be modified or canceled. Any applicant or recipient affected by such a decision of the department shall, upon request, be given reasonable notice and opportunity for a hearing by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 9; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-3/HB 228.

49-4-13.
Hearings; appeal.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, an applicant for or recipient of public assistance who is aggrieved by the action or inaction of the department, including any county department of family and children services, shall be entitled to a hearing. Each applicant or recipient shall be notified of his or her right to a hearing. Upon request for such hearing, reasonable notice of the time and place thereof shall be given to such applicant or recipient. Such hearing shall be conducted by the Office of State Administrative Hearings in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” the rules and regulations of the Office of State Administrative Hearings, and the rules and regulations prescribed by the board. The decision of the commissioner on any appeal shall be final, subject to the right to judicial review of contested cases under Chapter 13 of Title 50.

An applicant for or recipient of assistance under Article 9 of this chapter, the “Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Act,” shall be authorized to request and receive a hearing to challenge any denial, reduction, or termination of assistance based upon any action by the department, including any county department of family and children services. Nothing contained in this subsection shall operate to create an entitlement to the receipt of assistance under the TANF program.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 12; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 2804 (1997).

49-4-14.
Regulations as to records; use or disclosure of information; penalty.

The board is directed to prescribe regulations governing the custody, use, and preservation of the records, papers, files, and communications of the Department of Human Services, including the county departments, relating to public assistance. Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, such regulations shall provide safeguards restricting the use or disclosure of information concerning applicants for or recipients of public assistance to purposes directly connected with the administration of public assistance. The board is authorized in its discretion to include in such regulations provision for the public to have access to the records of disbursement or payment of public assistance made after March 30, 1965.

No person who obtains information by virtue of any regulation made pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall use such information for commercial or political purposes.

Any person violating subsection (b) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, §§ 10, 11; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

49-4-15.
Fraud in obtaining public assistance, food stamps, or Medicaid; penalties; recovery of overpayments.

Any person who by means of a false statement, failure to disclose information, or impersonation, or by other fraudulent device, obtains or attempts to obtain, or any person who knowingly or intentionally aids or abets such person in the obtaining or attempting to obtain:

Any grant or payment of public assistance, food stamps, or medical assistance (Medicaid) to which he or she is not entitled;

A larger amount of public assistance, food stamp allotment, or medical assistance (Medicaid) than that to which he or she is entitled; or

Payment of any forfeited grant of public assistance;

or any person who, with intent to defraud the department, aids or abets in the buying or in any way disposing of the real property of a recipient of public assistance shall be guilty of a misdemeanor unless the total amount of the value of public assistance, food stamps, and medical assistance (Medicaid) so obtained exceeds $1,500.00, in which event such person shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than five years. In determining the amount of value of public assistance, food stamps, and medical assistance (Medicaid) obtained by false statement, failure to disclose information, or impersonation, or other fraudulent device, the total amount obtained during any uninterrupted period of time shall be treated as one continuing offense.

It shall be a fraudulent device within the meaning of subsection (a) of this Code section, and punishable as therein provided, for any person:

Knowingly to use, alter, or transfer food stamp coupons or authorizations to purchase food stamp coupons in any manner not authorized by law;

Knowingly to possess food stamp coupons or authorizations to purchase food stamp coupons when he or she is not authorized by law to possess them;

Knowingly to possess or redeem food stamp coupons or benefits when he or she is not authorized by law to possess or redeem them; or

Knowingly to use or redeem food stamp coupons or benefits in any manner or for purposes not authorized by law.

Any person who obtains any payment of public assistance to which he is not entitled or in excess of that to which he is entitled shall be liable to the state for the amount of such overpayment.

Any person who intentionally, with knowledge of the fraud, aids or abets any recipient of public assistance in obtaining or attempting to obtain any payment of public assistance to which the recipient is not entitled or a payment in excess of that to which he is entitled shall also be liable to the state for the amount of such payment.

Any person who receives any payment of public assistance to which he is not entitled or in excess of that to which he is entitled shall be liable to the state for the amount of such overpayment.

Subject to the limitations provided in this paragraph, the amount of such overpayment may be recovered by civil action and, if the person receiving such overpayment continues on assistance, by proportionate reduction of future public assistance grants, in accordance with regulations of the board which shall conform to the federal Social Security Act and federal regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, until the excess amount has been paid. In any case in which, under this subsection, a person is liable to repay any sum, such sum may be collected without interest by civil action brought in the name of the department. Any repayment required by this subsection may be waived by the department, and the method of repayment, if any, including recoupments from current assistance grants, shall be determined by the department. Recoupment may be initiated without regard to whether the department has obtained a judgment in a civil action but shall not be initiated prior to notice and an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with this article. The department shall make such waivers and determinations of repayment and the manner of repayment in accordance with regulations of the board which shall conform to the federal Social Security Act and the federal regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

Any felony offense under this Code section may be prosecuted by accusation as provided in Code Section 17-7-70.1.

Prior to the filing of an accusation or the return of an indictment, a prosecuting attorney may defer further prosecution of such accusation or indictment and shall have the authority to enter into a consent agreement with the individual in which such individual admits to any overpayment, consents to disqualification for such period of time as is or may hereafter be provided by law, and agrees to repay, as restitution, such overpayment. Such agreement may provide for a lump sum repayment, installment payments, formula reduction of benefits, or any combination thereof. Such agreement shall toll the running of the statute of limitations for such offense for the period of the agreement. A consent agreement entered into in accordance with this subsection shall not constitute a criminal charge.

Any such agreement shall be filed in the criminal docket of the court having jurisdiction over the violation of this Code section without the necessity of the state filing an accusation or an indictment being returned by a grand jury. The clerk shall enter upon the docket “CONSENT AGREEMENT NOT A CRIMINAL CHARGE.”

Upon successful completion of the terms and conditions of the consent agreement, criminal prosecution of the individual for such offense shall be barred; provided, however, that nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit the state from introducing evidence of such offense as a similar transaction in any subsequent prosecution or for the purpose of impeachment. The successful completion of the terms and conditions of the agreement shall not be considered a criminal conviction.

If the individual fails to comply with the terms of such consent agreement, the state may proceed with a criminal prosecution.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 13; Ga. L. 1973, p. 183, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 477, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1490, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 994, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1964, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 466, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1517, §§ 1, 1.2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 519, § 4-1/HB 328.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (a), substituted “he or she” for “he” in paragraphs (1) and (2), and, in the undesignated language at the end of subsection (a), substituted “$1,500.00” for “$500.00” and inserted the second occurrence of “(Medicaid)”.

Cross references.

Fraud and related offenses, T. 16, C. 9, A. 4.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 1517, §§ 1 and 1.2 both enacted a subsection (d). Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, the subsection (d) enacted by § 1.2 was redesignated as subsection (f). See the Editor’s notes.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 1517, § 1.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: “Section 1.2 [subsection (f)] of this Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Two Strikes and You’re Off Act.’ ” and § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provided for severability.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 1517, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: “No later than July 1, 1996, the Department of Human Resources shall request from the appropriate federal agencies any waivers necessary to implement any part of this Act. Each portion of this Act for which such waiver is required shall become effective only if the waiver is obtained, and in that event shall become effective upon the ninetieth day following the receipt of such waiver. The remainder of this Act shall become effective July 1, 1996.”

Pursuant to Ga. L. 1996, p. 1517, § 3, waivers were applied for regarding those provisions of subsection (f) relating to public assistance. However, passage of the federal “Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996” eliminated the need for such waivers, effective July 1, 1997.
The provisions of subsection (f) enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1517, § 1.2 regarding medical assistance and food stamps did not become effective because the requisite federal waivers were not obtained.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

U.S. Code.

The federal Social Security Act, referred to in paragraph (c)(4) of this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 301

et seq.

Law reviews.

For review of 1996 social services legislation, see 13 Ga. U. L. Rev. 310 (1996).

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 284 (1997).

49-4-15.1.
Examination of financial records in instances of alleged fraud.

The department may examine any books, papers, or memoranda reflecting the income of, or financial records bearing upon the determination of the eligibility of, recipients in instances of alleged fraud by recipients of food stamps and public assistance. This process may be implemented by means of a subpoena which may be issued by the commissioner of human services, upon the advice of the State Department of Law. In order to consider the issuance of such subpoenas, the director of the department’s office of fraud and abuse must personally make application in writing to the commissioner of human services specifying why such information is necessary. If issued, such subpoenas shall compel the production of relevant documents. Subpoenas shall be served in the same manner as if issued by a superior court. If any person fails to obey a subpoena issued and served under this Code section with respect to any matter germane to the department’s investigation, on application of the department, through the commissioner of human services or the commissioner’s duly authorized representative, the superior court of the county in which the documents were required to be produced may issue an order requiring the person to comply with the subpoena and to produce the relevant documents.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-15.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1435, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-4/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 284 (1997).

49-4-16.
Research, demonstration, and work experience programs; surplus food distribution.

Except as modified by and pursuant to the provisions of this article the same provisions concerning eligibility for assistance as obtain with respect to old-age assistance, aid to the blind, temporary assistance for needy families, and aid to the totally and permanently disabled shall remain in force and effect.

The department is authorized to enter into agreements with departments and agencies of the government of the United States for the purposes of accepting grants, providing matching funds, and administering of such grants and funds, in accordance with regulations to be promulgated, for research and demonstration projects under Title XI, Section 1115, of the federal Social Security Act, without regard to the factor of state wideness and such other factors as may be required to be waived by the terms of the federal grant. The department also shall be authorized to participate in work experience or any other projects authorized under Title V of the Economic Opportunity Act of 1964, P.L. 88-452, 78 Stat. 508, and in the distribution of surplus food through a food stamp program under 7 U.S.C., Section 2013.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 15; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 49; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 7.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

U.S. Code.

Title XI, Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1315

.

Title V of the federal Economic Opportunity Act of 1964, referred to in this Code section, was formerly codified at

42 U.S.C. § 2921

et seq. but was repealed by Pub. L. 97-35, Title VI, § 683 (a).

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 284 (1997).

49-4-17.
Funding costs of assistance and administration; county participation not required.

The cost of administration and the cost of public assistance provided under any of the categories of public assistance authorized under Code Section 49-4-3 shall be met from such funds as shall be made available therefor from state and federal appropriations. No county shall be required to participate in the cost of such public assistance or in the cost of the administration thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 17; Ga. L. 1970, p. 451, § 1.

49-4-17.1.
[Repealed] Establishment of pilot community work experience programs.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 1281 and Ga. L. 1984, p. 22; repealed by Ga. L. 1986, p. 410, § 1, effective July 1, 1986.

49-4-18.
Article construed with federal Social Security Act; adoption of rules to comply with federal act.

It is the intention of the General Assembly that this article be construed consistent with the federal Social Security Act, and any provision of this article found to be in conflict with the federal Social Security Act shall be deemed to be void and of no effect. It is further the intention of the General Assembly, in view of the joint state and federal financial participation in the assistance programs, that the department shall be authorized to adopt such regulations as may be necessary to comply with the requirements of the federal Social Security Act.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 16.

U.S. Code.

The federal Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 401

et seq.

49-4-19.
Social assistance register.

It shall be the duty of the department to establish and maintain a social assistance register and to provide for the listing in such register of groups, associations, organizations, and individuals who notify the department or any county department of family and children services that they are willing to assist citizens who are receiving public assistance or who need aid to improve or ensure the quality of their lives. The department shall provide for the dissemination of the names of such entities and individuals to those in need of assistance. It shall be the further duty of the department to publicize the existence of the social assistance register and to inform the public of the opportunities which members of the public have to enrich the lives of others.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 4A.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the enactment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 284 (1997).